Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1422
Franchise; hearing; approval.

No franchisor shall enter into any franchise for the purpose of establishing
an additional motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer, motorcycle,
or trailer dealership or warranty repair service facility, in any community
in which the same line-make is then represented, unless the franchisor has
first established in a hearing held under the
Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act that there is good cause
for such additional motor vehicle, combination motor vehicle and trailer,
motorcycle, or trailer dealership under such franchise, or warranty repair
service facility, and that it is in the public interest.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 22;

Laws 2003, LB 182, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 74.

In an application for the establishment of a new motor vehicle franchise, the franchisor has the burden of establishing the existence of good cause for establishing the dealership and that such dealership is in the public interest. In re Application of General Motors Corp., 232 Neb. 11, 439 N.W.2d 453 (1989).